Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202667-462
Fees.

The filing fee for filing a statement of partnership authority pursuant to section 67-415, a statement of qualification pursuant to section 67-454, or a statement of foreign qualification pursuant to section 67-458 is one hundred ten dollars if the filing is submitted in writing and one hundred dollars if the filing is submitted electronically pursuant to section 84-511. The filing fee for all other filings by partnerships or limited liability partnerships pursuant to the Uniform Partnership Act of 1998 is thirty dollars if the filing is submitted in writing and twenty-five dollars if the filing is submitted electronically pursuant to section 84-511. A fee of one dollar per page shall be paid for a certified copy of any document on file pursuant to the act and ten dollars for the certificate. The filing fees pursuant to the act shall be paid to the Secretary of State and remitted to the State Treasurer. The State Treasurer shall credit sixty percent of the fees to the General Fund and forty percent of the fees to the Secretary of State Cash Fund.

Laws 1997, LB 523, § 62;

Laws 2020, LB910, § 28.